Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Capital City Airport

174.500.
Definitions for KRS 174.500 to 174.510.

As used in KRS

174.500

to

174.510

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means the Department of Aviation;

“State aircraft” means aircraft owned by the Commonwealth, leased by the Commonwealth, or otherwise under the control of the Commonwealth and administratively assigned to the department. It shall also include air charters by the department. However, this shall not include or apply to any and all aircraft assigned to, owned, leased, operated, or controlled by the Department of Kentucky State Police, or otherwise under the control or direction of the Department of Kentucky State Police. The operation, maintenance, scheduling, and care of Department of Kentucky State Police aircraft shall not be included under or affected by KRS

174.500

to

174.510

; and

“Official business” means any activity involving travel in a state aircraft if the activity is reasonably required, expected, or appropriate, considering the nature of the using public official’s job responsibilities. The activities shall include but not be limited to attendance by officials at nonpartisan ceremonial functions and events where their appearance is normally expected by virtue of their office or where official representation of the Commonwealth is otherwise appropriate, and to nonpolitical flights by the Governor and members of his immediate family when accompanying or representing him.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 605, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 85, § 120, effective June 26, 2007; repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 2009, ch. 13, § 16, effective June 25, 2009.

174.502.
Policy development, supervision, management, and administration of Capital City Airport Division.

The commissioner of the department shall be responsible for overall policy development and supervision of the Capital City Airport Division.

A division director shall head the Capital City Airport Division within the Department of Aviation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 605, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 85, § 120, effective June 26, 2007; repealed, reenact, and amend Acts 2009, ch. 13, § 17, effective June 25, 2009.

174.504.
Functions of Capital City Airport Division — Authority for administrative regulations.

The functions of the Capital City Airport Division shall be to:

Manage and operate the Capital City Airport;

Oversee the maintenance and care of all state aircraft;

Control the scheduling and operational use of state aircraft, including air charters; and

Collect from using agencies and officers the costs of operating state aircraft, including air charters.

Subject to the approval of the department and in accordance with applicable state and federal statutes and regulations, the Capital City Airport Division shall promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A to:

Establish user fees to be paid by users of the services and facilities of the Capital City Airport for charges including, but not limited to, hangar fees, tie-down fees, fuel, and aircraft supplies; and

Establish fees for the usage of state aircraft.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 605, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2009, ch. 13, § 18, effective June 25, 2009.

174.506.
Use of state aircraft.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, state aircraft, including air charters, shall be used only for official business.

State aircraft shall not be used for personal business, except when the Governor or Lieutenant Governor, for reasons of security, protocol, ceremonial functions, or overall demands of time, require travel considerations not accorded to other officials. In recognition of these realities, flights that may be solely for personal business, or partly for official business or partly for personal business, may be scheduled for the Governor or the Lieutenant Governor and their immediate families.

The cost of flights scheduled solely for personal business of the Governor or Lieutenant Governor shall be charged to that officer in accordance with the rate schedule set forth in the administrative regulations authorized by KRS

174.504

.

If a particular flight is in part official business and part personal business, the Governor or the Lieutenant Governor shall make a reasonable allocation of the flight time between official and personal business and be responsible for paying with nonstate funds to the Capital City Airport Division the charge for the part of the flight that is allocable to personal business. The rate charged shall be calculated using costs that would be considered in a rate developed by a commercial air charter company. In these cases, the allocation made and the basis for the allocation shall be indicated on the aircraft request form.

Constitutional officers, other elected state officials, members of the General Assembly, officers and employees of the cabinets, departments, and agencies of state government, officers and employees of other governmental units, and other persons traveling under the auspices of a state agency or in connection with state business deemed desirable by an agency head, including dependents of state officials, and news media representatives and other persons having an interest in the official purpose of the trip may be authorized to use state aircraft. Charges for travel in state aircraft shall be paid by the requesting state agency in accordance with the rate schedule established in administrative regulations authorized by KRS

174.504

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 605, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; repealed, reenact, and amend, Acts 2009, ch. 13, § 19, effective June 25, 2009.

174.508.
Approval of requests for use of state aircraft.

All requests for use of state aircraft shall be approved in advance by the:

Constitutional officer;

Program cabinet secretary or his designee in writing;

For the judicial branch, the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court or the director of the Administrative Office of the Courts; or

For the legislative branch, the co-chairs of the Legislative Research Commission or the director of the Legislative Research Commission.

Verbal requests for state aircraft transportation may be honored. However, all requests for state aircraft shall be provided in writing to the Capital City Airport Division within five (5) working days of the date of the flight.

Approving officials shall be responsible for determining that a trip is for official business, that use of state aircraft is the most appropriate means of transportation, and that the proposed passenger complement conforms to the requirements of KRS 174.506(3). In determining the passenger complement, requesting agencies shall weigh the benefit to the agency of the inclusion of additional passengers against the increased costs that might be incurred if a larger aircraft is required to accommodate additional passengers on a trip.

All requests for use of state aircraft shall be submitted on a form prescribed by the Capital City Airport Division and shall contain at a minimum the following information:

Cabinet or agency name;

Department name with appropriate billing account number;

Purpose of the trip;

Destination, including any planned stopovers and the reason for them;

Names of all passengers on the flight; and

Identification of any percentage of the flight that is for personal business in cases of the Governor or Lieutenant Governor as allowed under KRS

174.506

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 605, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; repealed, reenact, and amend, Acts 2009, ch. 13, § 20, effective June 25, 2009.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was formerly compiled as KRS

36.420

.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. III, 34 at 1752.

174.510.
Recordkeeping for Capital City Airport Division and use of state aircraft.

The Capital City Airport Division shall arrange for all trips and maintain flight cards, passenger manifests, payment documents, and interaccount bills pertaining to each flight.

Pilots for all state agencies shall maintain a flight manifest for all flights which shall include the passengers’ names, information pertaining to points of origin and destination, and any side trips or stopovers for each flight.

The Capital City Airport Division shall maintain original manifests for all trips using state aircraft.

Originals of requests for the use of state aircraft shall be kept by the Capital City Airport Division, with the following exceptions:

The Governor and Lieutenant Governor shall maintain originals of all requests for the use of state aircraft made by their respective offices; and

In cases where the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development has certified in an aircraft request that disclosure of the identities of passengers or the purpose of a trip will violate needs for confidentiality required for economic development efforts, the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development shall maintain complete original records of the request in his office.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 605, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; repealed, reenact, and amend, Acts 2009, ch. 13, § 21, effective June 25, 2009.